Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1081
Nuisance plant, defined.

Nuisance plant shall mean any plant not economically essential to the welfare of the people of Nebraska, as determined by the department, and which may serve as a favorable host of plant pests or may be detrimental to the agricultural interests of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 10.